Connecticut, session 2026, SB00058.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subsection (k) of section 12-218e of the general statutes be
amended to restore the cap of two million five hundred thousand
dollars, eliminated by public act 25-168, on a combined group's tax
liability on a unitary basis.